Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB424.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 45 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 308.1. Redundant advertising on Internet by political subdivisions or municipal authorities . (a) Publication.--If a political subdivision or municipal authority is required to advertise in a newspaper of general circulation, the political subdivision or municipal authority may publish a redundant advertisement on the political subdivision's or municipal authority's publicly accessible Internet website in addition to the newspaper advertisement.(b) Effect of redundant advertisement.--If the newspaper advertisement fails to be timely published by the newspaper, the 12345678910111213141516171819 advertisement shall be valid on the date that the advertisement was redundantly advertised on the political subdivision's or municipal authority's publicly accessible Internet website. (c) Proof of publication.--A political subdivision or municipal authority that holds a meeting under a redundant advertisement shall enter in the record a copy of the advertisement provided to the newspaper and proof that the political subdivision or municipal authority purchased the advertisement in a timely fashion. Proof shall consist of a receipt or any other similar communication showing the amount paid and the date of the purchase.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "redundant advertisement" means a copy of the information submitted to a publication to be used as an advertisement in accordance with the provisions of law.Section 2. Section 709 of Title 65 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 709. Public notice.* * *(b.1) Redundant advertising on Internet by political subdivisions or municipal authorities .--Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a political subdivision or municipal authority created by a political subdivision may satisfy the public notice requirement by using a redundant advertisement in accordance with 45 Pa.C.S. § 308.1 (relating to redundant advertising on Internet by political subdivisions or municipal authorities ). * * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0424PN0399 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829